California statutes. Public Resources Code
At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting, all sealed proposals which have been received shall in public session be opened, examined, and recorded by the governing body, and the property may be leased to the highest responsible bidder in the judgment of the governing body. The governing body may, should it deem such action for the best public interest, at any time reject any and all bids and withdraw the property from lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.

An order to lease made by the governing body shall authorize and direct the execution and delivery by the chair or other presiding officer of a lease to the lessee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 13.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.5.

No lease or modification thereof or amendment thereto for the production, extraction, or removal of minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons from tide or submerged lands which have been granted by the State to a public agency in trust wherein the State has not reserved the minerals, shall be effective or shall be delivered to the lessee unless and until it has been approved by the State Lands Commission.

Prior to adopting the resolution provided for by Section 7052, the governing body may petition the State Lands Commission for approval of the form of the resolution.

When any public agency mentioned in Section 7056 has the right to designate drill sites or areas for the production of oil, gas or other hydrocarbons from tide or submerged lands pursuant to leases, operating agreements, other agreements, or modifications or amendments thereof, which are otherwise authorized by law, then such public agencies must first obtain the approval of the State Lands Commission before designating such drill sites or areas. Such designation and approval shall, as far as possible, conform to the legal requirements, policies and regulations applicable to the development of state-owned or controlled tide or submerged lands for the production of oil, gas or other hydrocarbons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

7055.

Any money accruing from leases under this chapter shall be paid into the general fund of the county or other public or quasi public corporation, body or agency for the use of the county or other public or quasi public corporation, body or agency, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all counties and to such public or quasi-public corporations, bodies and agencies as are not otherwise authorized by law to lease for the production of oil, gas and other hydrocarbons, or for the mining of other minerals, lands owned by such public or quasi-public corporation, body or agency, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such of the following districts as are not otherwise authorized by law to lease land for such purposes, to wit: mosquito abatement districts, pest abatement districts, county sanitation districts, sanitary districts, local health districts, public cemetery districts, fire protection districts, park and recreation districts, placer mining districts, soil conservation districts, harbor and port districts, veterans memorial districts, school districts, airport districts, conservancy districts, flood control districts, drainage districts, irrigation districts, reclamation districts, levee districts, water districts, overflow districts, storm water districts and county power pumping districts; provided, however, that notwithstanding any other provisions of law authorizing the execution of such leases, the governing body of any district mentioned in this section may lease lands belonging to such district for the production of oil, gas and other minerals upon complying with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 171.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.5.

The provisions of Sections 7051 to 7056, inclusive, shall apply to operating agreements and all other types of agreements entered into by the agencies mentioned in Section 7056 for the purposes described in Section 7051.

This section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the pre-existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

7057.

The property of any city may be leased for the purpose of producing or effecting the production of minerals, oil, gas or other hydrocarbon substances for a period not to exceed 35 years unless such property shall have been dedicated or acquired as a park, highway, street, walk or public playground, in which event such property may be leased for such purposes provided that the use of such property for park, highway, street, walk or public playground purposes shall not be substantially interfered with thereby; provided however, that if in the judgment of the governing body of any such park, highway, street, walk or public playground, drilling for oil or gas would not substantially interfere with the use of such property for park, highway, street, walk or playground purposes, then any such lease on any such property shall provide that drilling for oil or gas beneath the surface of such property shall be done by means of slant drilling from surface locations outside the outer boundaries of any such property, or from designated locations inside the outer boundaries of such property, which inside locations will not interfere substantially with the use of such property for such park, highway, street, walk or playground purposes. Such governing body shall prescribe such terms and conditions in such lease to the end that any drilling and producing operations will interfere as little as is possible with the use of the property for such park, highway, street, walk or playground purposes.

The amendment of this section made at the 1959 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the preexisting law. 

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no tide or submerged lands owned or under the jurisdiction of any city shall be leased for the exploration for, drilling for or production of petroleum products within the boundaries of the areas of the County of Los Angeles described in subdivision (a) of Section 6871.2 unless such lands are within one nautical mile of the ordinary high water mark, the applicable conditions of the Public Resources Code and requirements of the State Lands Commission have been met, and the drilling for oil and gas deposits is to be done by means of slant drilling from an upland site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1438.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.

Any city, county, city and county, or district, in the interest of increasing the ultimate recovery of oil or gas, or of the protection of oil or gas from unreasonable waste, or of the possible arresting or amelioration of land subsidence, may enter into unit or co-operative agreements with respect to all or any part or parts of land owned, possessed, controlled, held in trust by, or otherwise under the jurisdiction of, such city, county, city and county or district, for the purpose of bringing about the co-operative development and operation of all or a part or parts of the oil and gas field in which such lands are located, or for the purpose of bringing about the development or operation of all or a part or parts of such field as a unit, or for the purpose of fixing the time, location, and manner of drilling and operating of wells for the production of oil or gas, or providing for the return or injection of gas, water or other substances into the subsurface of the earth for the purpose of storage or the repressuring of such oil or gas field. If any such unit or co-operative agreement includes tide and submerged lands which have been granted to a city, county, or city and county by a grant which does not reserve to the State the right to produce oil and gas therefrom, then the agreement shall comply with the requirements of Section 6879 of this code, and shall bind the State only if approved by the State Lands Commission pursuant to the provisions of Section 6879. Subject to the foregoing, and notwithstanding any competitive bidding requirements or restrictions on term contained in this chapter, or any other statute, including but not limited to Section 718 of the Civil Code, Sections 37383 and 37384 of the Government Code and Chapter 29 of the 1956 Statutes, First Extraordinary Session, any such city, county, city and county, or district may negotiate and execute all agreements necessary to effectuate, implement or modify any such unit or co-operative agreement, including the power to bind and commit lands, including tide and submerged lands, or any interest in lands, to the co-operative or unit agreement for the full term thereof, irrespective of whether the term thereof is for a period extending over the life of the field or for any other indefinite period, and irrespective of the termination date of any lease, contract or other agreement then in effect as to such lands. The power of any such city, county, city and county, or district to enter into unit or co-operative agreements shall include the power to do such other acts or things and to incur such other commitments and obligations as are customary in unit or co-operative agreements.

This section shall apply to any city, county, city and county, or district, irrespective of whether they are authorized by this chapter or any other statute to lease or develop lands for the production of oil, gas, and other hydrocarbon substances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.5.

Before a lease or any operating agreement or other type of agreement for the production of oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons is entered into after the effective date of this section, the governing body of a city shall in open meeting adopt a resolution declaring its intention to take such action. The resolution shall describe the property involved in such manner as to identify it, specify the minimum rental, royalty, or other consideration, and the term of the lease or agreement, the form of the lease or agreement, and one variable, biddable factor, on which bids will be received, and fix a time not less than 30 days thereafter and place for a public meeting of said governing body, at which meeting sealed proposals to lease or contract will be received and considered. The resolution shall, before the date of such meeting, be published once a week for four successive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the city where the property is situated, or, if there is no newspaper of general circulation in such city, in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county where the property is situated.

This section shall not apply to the renewal of leases or operating agreements issued for a fixed term; provided, that such renewals shall be subject to State Lands Commission approval as provided in Section 7060.

As used in this section, governing body of a city means the city council, or other city board or agency having jurisdiction by charter or law over the property involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

7059.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting, all sealed proposals which have been received shall in public session be opened, examined, and recorded by the governing body of the city, and the property shall be leased to, or the agreement shall be made and entered into with, the highest responsible bidder in the judgment of the governing body. The governing body may, however, should it deem such action for the best public interest, at any time reject any and all bids and withdraw the property from lease or contract.

As used in this section, governing body of a city means the city council, or other city board or agency having jurisdiction by charter or law over the property involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

7060.

(a) No such lease or agreement shall be effective unless prior to adopting the resolution provided for by Section 7058.5 the city shall have petitioned the State Lands Commission for approval of the proposed resolution, and the proposed resolution shall have been approved by the State Lands Commission.

(b) No city shall consent to the modification or amendment of any such lease or agreement without the advance consent of the State Lands Commission to such modification or amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

7061.

The provisions of Sections 7058.5 to 7059, inclusive, shall be applicable to all general-law cities and shall be applicable to general-law and chartered cities with respect to tide or submerged lands granted in trust to such cities by the State where mineral rights have not been reserved to the State. Section 7060 shall be applicable to both general-law and chartered cities only with respect to tide or submerged lands granted in trust to such cities by the State, where mineral rights have not been reserved to the State. The provisions of Sections 7058.5 to 7060, inclusive, shall not apply to activities regulated by Chapter 29 of the Statutes of the 1956 First Extraordinary Session.

The State Lands Commission may in its discretion exempt particular leases or operating agreements from the procedure required by Sections 7058.5 and 7059 where by reason of the small size of the property or drainage, actual or imminent, such procedure would in the judgment of the State Lands Commission in the particular case be impractical.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

7061.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7058, no city, county, city and county, or district may enter into a unit or cooperative agreement pursuant to that section under which exploration for, drilling for, or production of petroleum products is proposed with respect to any part or parts of an oil and gas field located in tide or submerged lands which are within the boundaries of the areas of the county of Los Angeles described in subdivision (a) of Section 6871.2 unless such lands are within one nautical mile of the ordinary high water mark, the applicable conditions of the Public Resources Code and requirements of the State Lands Commission have been met, and the drilling for oil and gas deposits is to be done by means of slant drilling from an upland site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1438.)
-------------------------------------------

7062.

(a) On or before October 1st of each year, each city shall cause to be made and filed with the State Lands Commission a detailed statement of all revenue and expenditures thereof from any operating agreement or other type of lease or agreement for the production of oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons, including obligations incurred but not yet paid. Said statement shall cover the fiscal year preceding its submission and shall show the project or operation for which each such expenditure or obligation is made or incurred.

(b) In addition to the other powers and duties specifically delegated to it, the State Lands Commission shall have authority to examine financial and operating records of any city relating to the production and sale of oil, gas, and other hydrocarbons under any operating agreement or other type of lease or agreement for the production of oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons and to conduct such other investigations and studies as it may deem necessary in connection therewith.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable only with respect to tide or submerged lands granted in trust to cities by the State. The provisions of this section shall not apply to activities regulated by Chapter 29 of the Statutes of the 1956 First Extraordinary Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1464.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Leases for Offshore Wind Energy Projects [7100. - 7100.]

7100.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6217, the commission shall deposit revenue generated from an offshore wind energy project lease in the Offshore Wind Energy Resiliency Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 30616.

(b) The commission or a local trustee of granted public trust lands, when issuing a lease for purposes of an offshore wind energy project, shall consider including within the lease reasonable compensatory mitigation for unavoidable impacts to fishing and tribal interests pursuant to Section 30616. In considering the inclusion of reasonable compensatory mitigation, the
 commission or a local trustee of granted public trust lands shall consider the recommendations for reasonable compensatory mitigation made by the California Offshore Wind Energy Fisheries Working Group established pursuant to Section 30616, including the working group’s recommendations for a payment structure to reasonably compensate commercial, tribal, and recreational fisheries and impacted commercial fish processors for unavoidable impacts associated with offshore wind energy projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 386, Sec. 1.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. SALE OF PUBLIC LANDS [7301. - 8106.]



  CHAPTER 1. School Lands and Indemnity Lands [7301. - 7404.]



  ARTICLE 1. Sale of School Lands [7301. - 7306.]

7301.

The commission may, in the best interest of the state, sell school lands. The commission may pay from the School Land Bank Fund, created pursuant to Section 8711, the typical costs and expenses attributable to a sale of school lands, such as escrow or other third-party costs, when it is in the best interest of the state to do so.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 311, Sec. 4.   (SB 1472)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7303.

The commission may, in the best interest of the state, exchange any public lands for lands of the United States of equal area or equal value, and the lands acquired in the exchange may then be sold in the manner and for cash as provided by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 622, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

7303.5.

Whenever the commission finds that it is in the best interests of the state for the acquisition of open space or for the purposes of consolidating, assembling, or managing parcels of land for the purposes authorized by this division, the commission may exchange school lands under its jurisdiction for lands owned by any state agency, political subdivision, or person, partnership, company, or corporation, or by the United States or any federal agency; provided, that the lands acquired pursuant to such exchange have equal or greater value than the lands conveyed.

Such acquired lands shall have the same status as to administration, control, and disposition as the lands conveyed.

The state may release the mineral rights in the lands conveyed, as provided in Section 6401, if it receives the mineral rights in the lands acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 908, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

7305.

When payment has been made for land sold under this article, the purchaser shall be entitled to a patent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7306.

The commission may sell timber separately from the land. Timber sold separately shall be removed in accordance with the Z'Berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 622, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Indemnity Land Selections [7400. - 7404.]

7400.

The Legislature finds and declares that, as of January 1, 2020, the commission has acquired roughly 81,643 acres of indemnity school lands and is owed roughly 51,000 additional acres of indemnity school lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 311, Sec. 7.   (SB 1472)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7401.

The commission shall ascertain from time to time the number of acres of land to which the state is entitled as indemnity and shall keep on file a statement showing of what those bases consist.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 311, Sec. 7.   (SB 1472)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7402.

Whenever the commission determines it to be in the best interest of the state, the commission may select lands of the United States equal in area to the number of acres or as otherwise provided under federal law to which the state is entitled as indemnity for any losses sustained by the state to its school land grants.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 311, Sec. 7.   (SB 1472)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.

The commission is the general agent of the state for the selection of indemnity lands in lieu of the losses sustained by the state to its school land grants.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 311, Sec. 7.   (SB 1472)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7404.

The commission may accept the benefits of the act of Congress approved July 17, 1914, enacted as Section 121 of Title 30 of the United States Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 311, Sec. 7.   (SB 1472)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Sale of Swamp and Overflowed Lands [7501. - 7556.]



  ARTICLE 1. Swamp and Overflowed Lands Subsequent to September 19, 1939 [7501. - 7501.]

7501.

Swamp and overflowed lands belonging to the state may be sold by the commission under rules and regulations prescribed by it and at a price fixed by it, payment to be made in cash to the commission. This section shall not affect the sale of swamp and overflowed lands under any application filed with the commission prior to September 19, 1939.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Swamp and Overflowed Lands Sold Prior to September 19, 1939 [7521. - 7537.]

7521.

The swamp and overflowed lands belonging to the State were sold prior to September 19, 1939, at the rate of one dollar ($1) an acre. Twenty per cent of the principal is payable within 50 days from the date of the approval of the survey by the commission. The balance, bearing interest at the rate of 7 per cent per annum, payable annually in advance, is due and payable one year after the passage of any act of the Legislature requiring such payment, or before, if desired by the purchasers. Bonds or warrants of reclamation districts having an outstanding indebtedness are receivable at par in payment for lands in such districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7522.

The commission shall not approve any application nor issue evidence of title for swamp and overflowed land, until six months after the land has been segregated by authority of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7523.

No claim shall be made by the State to any land as swamp or overflowed, which has not been returned as such by the United States, nor to lands for which preemption or homestead patents have been issued by the United States, or upon which there are settlers, occupying the land in good faith, who have filed their preemption or homestead declaratory statements. The commission shall not receive any application to purchase as swamp or overflowed lands, any land not returned as such by the United States, unless the application be accompanied by a certificate from the Register of the United States Land Office for the district in which the land is situated, or by the affidavits of two disinterested persons, that there is no preemption or homestead settler upon the land sought to be purchased, or if there is such settler, that he has resided on the land more than six months prior to the time of making such application. The application shall be invalid in every case where there is a valid preemption filing or homestead entry on the land sought to be purchased at the time the application is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7524.

Any person desiring to purchase swamp and overflowed lands shall make an affidavit and file it in the office of the commission, that he is a citizen of the United States, or has filed his intention to become so; that he is a resident of the State, of lawful age; that he desires to purchase lands (describing them) under the law providing for the sale of swamp and overflowed lands; that he does not know of any valid claim to the lands, other than his own; that he knows the land applied for and the exterior bounds thereof, and knows, of his own knowledge, that there are no settlers thereon; or, if there are, that the land has been segregated more than six months by authority of the United States; and that the land which he now owns (swamp and overflowed), together with that sought to be purchased, does not exceed 640 acres.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7525.

Any false statement contained in the affidavit defeats the right of the applicant to purchase the land, or to receive any evidence of title thereto, and if wilfully false, subjects him also to punishment for perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7526.

If at any time after such affidavit is filed in the office of the commission, and prior to the issuance of a patent for the lands described therein it is made to appear to the commission by the affidavit of any settler or person occupying such land for farming purposes, that he, or those under whom he claims, have been in the possession and occupancy of such lands, or any part thereof, for farming purposes, for over 10 years next prior to the date of the filing of the affidavit of the person desiring to purchase, and that his or their occupancy was open and notorious and was evidenced by actual enclosure, or by ditches, or monuments, or embankments, or levees, showing the actual extent thereof, and that he, or they under whom he claims, had, at the time of the filing of the affidavit by the person desiring to purchase, actually reclaimed such land and reduced it to a state of cultivation, and had been farming and cultivating the land; or if it appears from such affidavit filed by such person, that the affidavit filed by the person desiring to purchase the land is false in any of the statements made therein, the commission shall make an order referring the questions raised by such affidavits to the superior court of the county in which the land, or some part thereof, is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7527.

Within 30 days from the date of such order of reference, the party filing the affidavit raising such questions shall commence, in such court, an action to determine the questions. In his complaint in the action he shall set forth copies of the affidavit filed by the person desiring to purchase the land, and of the affidavit filed by himself with the commission. The production of a certified copy of the order of reference shall give the court full and complete jurisdiction to hear and determine the action. Pending the final judgment in the action, all proceedings in the commission’s office respecting the lands shall be stayed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7528.

If upon the trial of such action it appears that any of the statements made in the affidavit filed by the person desiring to purchase the land were false, or if it appears that the statements made in the affidavit filed by the settler or occupant of such land are true, the approval of location or certificate of purchase, if any has been made or issued, shall be canceled by judgment of the court. But if it appears that the statements contained within the affidavit of the person desiring to purchase the land are true, and that the statements made in the affidavit of the settler or occupant are untrue, the court shall enter its judgment accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7529.

Upon the filing with the commission of a copy of the final judgment of the court, the commission shall, if the judgment of the court cancels the location or certificate of purchase, enter an order of cancellation accordingly. But if by the judgment it is decreed that the person desiring to purchase the land is entitled to purchase it, the commission shall approve the location, or issue the certificate of purchase or other evidence of title, in accordance with the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7530.

Any person desiring to purchase lands, as provided in this article, which have been segregated by authority of the United States, but which have not been sectionized by the same authority, shall apply to the surveyor of the county in which the land is situated, to have the land which he desires to purchase surveyed. A certificate of such survey shall be attached to the affidavit required for the purchase of the lands. All surveys required of county surveyors by this section shall conform, as nearly as practicable, to the system adopted by the United States for the survey of the public lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7531.

All payments shall be made by the purchaser to the county treasurer of the county in which the land is situated. The treasurer shall receive the amounts to be paid including the fee for the certificate of purchase, if any. The treasurer shall endorse upon the certificate of purchase the amount of all payments and shall direct the purchaser to take the certificate of purchase, so endorsed, to the county auditor who shall charge the treasurer with the amount received and make his check upon the endorsed receipt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7532.

Upon the first day of July of each year the county treasurer shall prepare a report showing all moneys received for swamp and overflowed and tide lands during the preceding year, the number of the location or survey, the name of the purchaser, and the amount paid since the date of his last report, whether as principal or interest. The payment of the fee for the certificate of purchase shall also be entered in the proper column. The treasurer shall then send the report to the auditor who shall compare the items with the account of the treasurer and if it agrees with his entries countersign it and return it to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7533.

These reports shall be forwarded to the commission, and upon receipt thereof the commission shall enter the payment so reported to the credit of the purchaser, and shall notify the county treasurer of the receipt of his report, or if it is not correct return it for correction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7534.

The county treasurer shall retain all money arising from the sale of swamp and overflowed lands and place it to the credit of a separate trust fund or trust account. He shall compute interest on all sales of such lands from the date of the approval of the survey or the date of the certificate of location to the first day of January following such date, or, if for lands already purchased, up to the first of January following the day upon which the interest falls due, after which time all payments of principal and interest fall due on the first day of January.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 396.)
-------------------------------------------

7535.

If a reclamation district is organized in any county, the board of supervisors of each county in which any portion of the lands of the district are located, upon the application of any interested party, shall direct the auditor and treasurer to set apart from the county swamp-land fund all money received in payment of principal and interest on the lands within the district, as a fund to the credit of the district, after deducting any money previously expended from the swamp-land fund for the benefit of land within the district. The money in the district fund shall be paid out only for the purpose of reclaiming land within the district, or to the owners of such land after reclamation, as provided by law. All money paid in upon these lands and diverted to the use and benefit of other lands shall be replaced out of the first receipts from the land so benefited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

7536.

If any expenses pertaining to land in a reclamation district have been paid from the county swamp-land fund including expenses for attorney’s fees in the examination of the character of the land, the county treasurer shall deduct this amount from the amount otherwise found due to the land for which the expenses were paid, and only return to the owner of the land that portion of the money paid on the land which remains after deducting the amount paid for expenses pertaining to the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

7537.

Sections 7535 and 7536 do not apply to districts upon which controller’s warrants are outstanding, until after all of the warrants are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Provisions Relating to All Swamp and Overflowed Lands [7551. - 7556.]

7551.

Settlers upon swamp and overflowed lands belonging to the State who occupy such lands for farming or grazing purposes, and whose occupation is evidenced by actual enclosure, or by ditches or monuments showing the actual extent thereof, are preferred purchasers of such lands for six months after segregation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7552.

Lands within this State which are returned by the United States as swamp and overflowed lands, and shown as such on approved township plats, shall, as soon as patents are issued therefor by this State, be held to be of the character so returned. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the rights of any homestead or preemption settler claiming under the laws of the United States, nor to prejudice the rights of any settler located upon such lands to perfect title to the lands if permitted under existing laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7552.5.

Where lands above the ordinary high-water mark, granted to the state by the Arkansas Swamp Lands Act, Act of September 28, 1850, have been conveyed into private ownership by the State of California pursuant to an act authorizing the sale and conveyance of swamp and overflowed lands, such swamp and overflowed lands, by definition, are taken free of the common law public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries. Where a private owner, deriving title by virtue of such a conveyance of swamp and overflowed lands, dredges or has dredged such lands pursuant to then existing law, and such dredging results or has resulted in the navigable waters of the state flowing over such lands, such acts shall not operate to create or impose the common law public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries with respect to such lands. Such acts shall operate to create a navigational easement, in favor of the public, upon the waters which flow over the affected real property. The navigational easement so created may be extinguished only upon the lawful removal of the navigable waters from the real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7553.

When the original patent to swamp and overflowed land of the State has been lost or destroyed, and is not of record in the county where the land is situate, and no duplicate or copy thereof is in the office of the Secretary of State or in the office of the commission, a patent shall be issued to the original purchaser for the same land, as other patents are issued, when it is proven to the satisfaction of the commission from the data in the office of the Secretary of State, or in the office of the commission, that an original patent has been lawfully issued to the original purchaser, and from other satisfactory proof that it has been lost or destroyed, and is not of record in the recorder’s office of the county in which the land is situate. The patent so reissued shall have the same force and effect as the original patent, and shall contain the clause “This patent is issued to take the place of the original patent issued for the same land, on the (give date of original patent, and by whom issued), and is not intended to change the title of the persons in whom the land is now vested and only to complete the record title from the State of California.” The commission shall collect the same fee therefor as in issuing original patents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7554.

Any person having a vested interest in any swamp and overflowed land, covered by a patent lost or destroyed, and not of record in the county where the land is situate, in order to obtain the reissuing of the patent as provided in Section 7553, shall make an affidavit and file it in the office of the commission, setting forth that he has a vested interest in the land, or a part thereof, to which he makes application for a patent to be reissued from the State of Califoria. He shall also state in the affidavit the chain of title from the original patentee to and including the present owners of the land described in the original patent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7555.

(a) In a case in which the state has sold lands acquired by it as swamp and overflowed lands, the person claiming or deraigning title to any lands through or under a purchase of the lands from the state may bring suit against the state in a court of competent jurisdiction of the state to establish the boundaries of, and to quiet title to, the land or a portion of the land, and may prosecute the suit to final judgment. The complaint in the action shall contain a plat of the property described in the complaint, which plat shall show the location of the property in respect to a section corner, the location of which is shown on an approved United States government township plat, or in respect to a monument that has been established by reference to a section corner.

(b) Service of summons in the suits shall be made upon the Chair of the State Lands Commission and upon the Attorney General, and the Attorney General shall represent the state in the suits.
